Washington statutes.
RCW 43.09.340

Post-audit of books of state auditor.

The governor shall, at least every two years, provide for a post-audit of the books, accounts, and records of the state auditor, and the funds under his or her control, to be made either by independent qualified public accountants or the director of financial management, as he or she may determine. The expense of making such audit shall be paid from appropriations made therefor from the general fund.

[ 1995 c 301 s 24; 1979 c 151 s 93; 1965 c 8 s 43.09.340. Prior: 1947 c 114 s 2; 1941 c 196 s 6; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 11018-6.]